Wyoming statutes. Title 39 Taxation and Revenue
Cross references. —

As to consent of people to taxation, and uniformity and equality of taxation, see art. 1, § 28, Wyo. Const.

As to origin of revenue bills, see art. 3, § 33, Wyo. Const.

As to delegation of power to levy taxes, see art. 3, § 37, Wyo. Const.

As to exemptions from taxation, see art. 15, § 12, Wyo. Const.

As to authorization of tax by law, see art. 15, § 13, Wyo. Const.

As to taxation of federal and Indian land, and restriction on taxation of nonresidents, see art. 21, § 26, Wyo. Const.

As to state treasurer generally, see §

9-1-409

.

As to department of administration and information, see §

9-2-1001

et seq.

As to public funds generally, see chapter 4 of title 9.

Revision of Title. —

Title 39 was recodified by Laws 1998, ch. 5. As a part of that recodification, chapters 1 through 7 in title 39 are repealed. Amendments made to chapters 1 through 7 during the 1998 legislative session have been incorporated into the newly enacted chapters by the Wyoming Legislative Service Office. The new codification begins with chapter 11. Chapters 8 through 10 have been omitted intentionally. For table of revised and renumbered sections, see Volume 11 of the Wyoming Statutes Annotated.

Joint resolution. —

Laws 2002, Sp. Sess., Senate Joint Resolution No. 2, §§ 1 to 4, requests Congress to propose and submit to the several states for ratification an amendment to the United States Constitution prohibiting the Supreme Court and inferior federal courts from having the power to instruct or order a state or political subdivision, or an official of such to levy or increase taxes.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Administrative Law: Rulemaking and Contested Case Practice in Wyoming,” see XXXI Land & Water L. Rev. 685 (1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Presumptions and evidence respecting identification of land on which property taxes were paid to establish adverse possession, 36 ALR4th 843.

Library References. —

American Law of Mining, 2nd Edition §
193.03 (Matthew Bender).